zh-TW: 體育用品 > 室外休閒 > 直排輪/雙排輪: 直排輪與滑輪配件; 直排輪/雙排輪護具; 直排輪配件; 直排輪; 雙排輪零件; 溜冰鞋; 越野滑輪零件; 滑輪雪板
pl: Sprzęt sportowy > Rekreacja na świeżym powietrzu > Jazda na wrotkach i łyżworolkach: Akcesoria do rolek i wrotek; Sprzęt ochronny do jazdy na wrotkach i łyżworolkach; Części do łyżworolek; Łyżworolki; Części do wrotek; Wrotki; Części do nartorolek; Narty rollerski
pt-PT: Artigos de desporto > Atividades recreativas no exterior > Patinagem com patins em linha e de 4 rodas: Acessórios para patins em linha e de 4 rodas; Equipamento de proteção para patinagem com patins em linha e de 4 rodas; Proteções para patinagem com patins em linha; Patins em linha; Peças para patins de 4 rodas; Patins de 4 rodas; Peças para esquis com rodas; Esquis com rodas
en: Sporting Goods > Outdoor Recreation > Inline & Roller Skating: Inline & Roller Skating Accessories; Inline & Roller Skating Protective Gear; Inline Skate Parts; Inline Skates; Roller Skate Parts; Roller Skates; Roller Ski Parts; Roller Skis
ja: スポーツ用品 > 屋外レクリエーション > インラインスケート・ローラースケート: インライン＆ローラースケートアクセサリー; インラインスケート・ローラースケート用プロテクター; インラインスケート靴パーツ; インラインスケート靴; ローラースケート靴パーツ; ローラースケート靴; ローラースキー用パーツ; ローラー スキー
es: Equipamiento deportivo > Actividades al aire libre > Patinaje sobre ruedas y en línea: Accesorios para patinaje sobre ruedas y en línea; Protecciones para patinaje sobre ruedas y en línea; Piezas para patines en línea; Patines en línea; Piezas para patines de ruedas; Patines de cuatro ruedas; Piezas para esquís sobre ruedas; Esquís sobre ruedas
da: Sportsartikler > Friluftsliv > Rulleskøjter og inlinere: Tilbehør til inline- og rulleskøjter; Beskyttelsesudstyr til rulleskøjter og inlinere; Reservedele til inlineskøjter; Inlineskøjter; Reservedele til rulleskøjter; Rulleskøjter; Dele til rulleski; Rulleski
ko: 스포츠용품 > 야외 레크레이션 > 인라인/롤러 스케이팅: 인라인 및 롤러스케이트 액세서리; 인라인/롤러 스케이트 보호 장비; 인라인 스케이트 부품; 인라인 스케이트; 롤러 스케이트 부품; 롤러스케이트; 롤러스키 부품; 롤러 스키
tr: Spor Malzemeleri > Açık Hava Etkinlikleri > Inline ve Roller Paten: Sıralı ve tekerlekli paten aksesuarları; Inline ve Roller Paten Koruyucu Kıyafetleri; Inline Paten Pedleri; Slalom Patenleri; Roller Paten Parçaları; Tekerlekli Patenler; Tekerlekli kayak parçaları; Tekerlekli Kaykay
hu: Sportszerek > Szabadtéri kikapcsolódás > Inline- és görkorcsolya: Görkorcsolyás kiegészítők; Inline- és görkorcsolya-védőfelszerelés; Inline-korcsolya-alkatrészek; Inline-korcsolyák; Görkorcsolya-alkatrészek; Görkorcsolyák; Görsíalkatrészek; Görkorcsolya-sílécek
cs: Sportovní potřeby > Outdoorové aktivity > In-line a kolečkové brusle: Příslušenství k inline a kolečkovým bruslím; Ochranné pomůcky pro in-line a kolečkové brusle; Díly na in-linové brusle; Inline brusle; Díly na kolečkové brusle; Trekové brusle; Díly na kolečkové lyže; Kolečkové lyže
sk-SK: Športový tovar > Exteriérové rekreakčné športy > Jazda na inline a kolieskových korčuliach: Príslušenstvo pre inline a kolieskové korčule; Ochranné pomôcky na jazdu na inline a kolieskových korčuliach; Diely na kolieskové korčule; Inline korčule; Diely na kolieskové korčule; Kolieskové korčule; Diely na kolieskové lyže; Kolieskové bežky
el: Αθλητικά είδη > Υπαίθριες δραστηριότητες αναψυχής > Πατινάζ εντός & εκτός δρόμου: Αξεσουάρ για ρόλερ και inline πατίνια; Προστατευτικός εξοπλισμός τροχοπέδιλων μονής σειράς τροχών και πατινιών; Ανταλλακτικά τροχοπέδιλων μονής σειράς τροχών; Τροχοπέδιλα μονής σειράς τροχών; Εξαρτήματα πατινιών; Πατίνια; Εξαρτήματα για ρόλερ σκι; Πέδιλα σκι με ρόδες
nb: Sportsutstyr > Friluftsliv > Inline og rulleskøyter: Tilbehør til inline- og rulleskøyter; Beskyttelsesutstyr for rulleskøyter; Deler til inline-skøyter; Inline-skøyter; Deler til rulleskøyter; Rulleskøyter; Deler til rulleski; Rulleski
sv: Sportartiklar > Utomhusaktiviteter > Inline- och rullskridskoåkning: Tillbehör för inlines och rullskridskor; Skyddsutrustning för inline- och rullskridskoåkning; Inlinestillbehör; Inlineskridskor; Rullskridskotillbehör; Rullskridskor; Delar till rullskidor; Rullskidor
ro-RO: Articole sportive > Recreere în aer liber > Patinaj cu role în linie și patinaj cu rotile: Accesorii pentru role și patine cu rotile; Echipament de protecție pentru patinaj cu role în linie și patinaj cu rotile; Piese patine pentru pentru patinaj cu role în linie; Patine cu role în linie; Piese pentru patine cu rotile; Patine cu rotile; Piese pentru schiuri cu rotile; Schiuri pe role
pt-BR: Artigos esportivos > Atividades ao ar livre > Patinação inline e sobre rodas: Acessórios para patins in-line e tradicionais; Equipamento de proteção para patinação inline e sobre rodas; Peças para patins inline; Patins in-line; Peças para patins sobre rodas; Patins; Peças para roller skis; Patins inline
bg-BG: Спортни стоки > Спортни занимания на открито > Каране на ролери и ролкови кънки: Аксесоари за ролкови кънки и ролери; Защитна екипировка за каране на ролери и ролкови кънки; Протектори за каране на ролери; Ролери; Части за ролкови кънки; Ролкови кънки; Части за ролкови ски; Ролер ски
hr-HR: Sportska oprema > Rekreacija na otvorenom > Rolanje i koturanje: Dodaci za rolanje i koturanje; Zaštitna oprema za rolanje i koturanje; Dijelovi rola; Role; Dijelovi za koturaljke; Koturaljke; Dijelovi za skijaške role; Skijaške role
fi: Urheilutarvikkeet > Ulkoharrasteet > Rullaluistelu: Rullaluistelutarvikkeet; Rullaluistelusuojukset; Inline-rullaluistimien osat; Inline-rullaluistimet; Rullaluistimien osat; Rullaluistimet; Rullahiihtosuksien osat; Rullasukset
fr: Équipements sportifs > Loisirs de plein air > Patin à roulettes et roller: Accessoires de patins à roulettes et rollers; Équipement de protection pour roller et patin à roulettes; Pièces de rollers; Roller en ligne; Pièces de patins à roulettes; Patins à roulettes; Pièces pour ski-roues; Rollerskis
nl: Sportartikelen > Buitenrecreatie > Inlineskaten en rollerskaten: Accessoires voor inline skaten en rolschaatsen; Beschermende uitrusting voor inlineskaten en rollerskaten; Onderdelen voor inlineskaten; Inlineschaatsen; Onderdelen voor rollerskaten; Rolschaatsen; Onderdelen voor rolski's; Rolski's
it: Articoli sportivi > Ricreazione outdoor > Pattinaggio in linea e tradizionale: Accessori per pattinaggio a rotelle e in linea; Protezioni per pattinaggio in linea e tradizionale; Componenti per pattini in linea; Pattini in linea; Componenti per pattini tradizionali; Pattini classici; Parti per skiroll; Sci a rotelle
th: อุปกรณ์กีฬา > สันทนาการกลางแจ้ง > อินไลน์และโรลเลอร์สเกต: อุปกรณ์เสริมอินไลน์สเกตและโรลเลอร์สเกต; อุปกรณ์ป้องกันของอินไลน์และโรลเลอร์สเกต; อะไหล่โรลเลอร์เบลด; อินไลน์สเกต; ชิ้นส่วนของโรลเลอร์สเกต; โรลเลอร์สเกต; ชิ้นส่วนโรลเลอร์สกี; โรลเลอร์สกี
ru: Спортивные товары > Активный отдых на открытом воздухе > Катание на роликах: Аксессуары для катания на роликах; Защитная экипировка для катания на роликах; Детали для роликовых коньков; Роликовые коньки; Детали для роликов-квадов; Ролики-квады; Запчасти для лыжероллеров; Лыжероллеры
de: Sportartikel > Outdoor-Aktivitäten > Skaten: Inline- & Rollschuhzubehör; Schutzausrüstung für Skater; Inlineskate-Teile; Inline-Skates; Rollschuh-Teile; Rollerskates; Rollski-Teile; Rollskis
vi: Dụng cụ thể thao > Giải trí ngoài trời > Trượt pa-tanh và pa-tanh một hàng: Phụ kiện trượt patin; Thiết bị bảo vệ trượt pa-tanh và pa-tanh một hàng; Phụ tùng trượt pa-tanh một hàng; Trượt patin; Phụ tùng trượt pa-tanh; Giày trượt patanh; Phụ tùng ván trượt tuyết patin; Trượt tuyết pa tanh
sl-SI: Športna oprema > Rekreacija na prostem > Rolanje in kotalkanje: Dodatki za rolerje in kotalke; Zaščitna oprema za rolanje in kotalkanje; Deli za rolerje; Rolerji; Deli za kotalke; Kotalke; Deli za tekaške rolerje; Tekaške smuči
zh-CN: 体育用品 > 户外休闲 > 直排轮滑/四轮旱冰: 直排轮滑和双排轮滑配件; 直排轮滑/四轮旱冰护具; 直排轮滑部件; 直排溜冰鞋; 四轮旱冰部件; 轮式溜冰鞋; 越野滑轮零件; 轮式滑雪板
lt-LT: Sporto prekės > Poilsis lauke > Ratukinių pačiūžų ir riedučių sportas: Ratukinių pačiūžų ir riedučių priedai; Ratukinių pačiūžų ir riedučių apsauginė įranga; Ratukinių pačiūžų dalys; Ratukinės pačiūžos; Riedučių dalys; Riedučiai; Riedslidžių dalys; Riedslidės